Hawaii statutes.
§382-7 Interference with government
operations; injunctions. (a) All persons employed by the governor under
sections 382-3 to 382-5 shall be deemed government employees within the meaning
of sections 86-1 to 86-6 and such sections shall be applicable to the
operations under sections 382-3 to 382-5.

(b) After a proclamation of an emergency
pursuant to section 382-2 and until the termination of government operations as
provided by section 382-6, it shall be unlawful for:

(1) Any private employee or labor organization to
engage in a strike, or a concerted refusal to transport or otherwise handle any
cargo or to perform services on any vessel or with respect to any facility;

(2) Any persons to concert to withhold patronage,
employment, or other beneficial business intercourse; or

(3) Any person, with a purpose of instigating,
inducing, procuring, bringing about, coercing, or inciting any such strike or
concerted action or a continuation thereof, to picket or to establish or
maintain a picket line of one or more persons, where an object of any such
strike, concerted action, or picketing is to:

(A) Interfere with government operations
under this chapter;

(B) Force or require any person to cease
transporting or otherwise handling cargo with respect to which stevedoring
services or related services have been or are to be performed by the government
under this chapter; or

(C) Cause loss, injury, or damage to any
person by reason of the person's having transported or otherwise handled or
being about to transport or otherwise handle any cargo with respect to which
stevedoring services or related services have been or are to be performed by
the government under this chapter;

provided that in the case of an emergency arising
out of a labor dispute in the stevedoring industry, this subsection shall not,
by reason of refusal to return to employment involved in such labor dispute or
by reason of refusal to accept employment by the government, apply to any
employee engaged in the labor dispute. For the purposes of this subsection,
the term "employee" includes any employee and is not limited to the
employees of a particular employer and "private employee" means one
employed by other than the government.

This section shall be enforceable in the same
manner as that provided in section 86-4 for the enforcement of sections 86-1 to
86-6. [L 1951, c 209, §6; RL 1955, §92-8; HRS §382-7; gen ch 1985]

Note

Sections 86-1 to 86-6 referred to in text are repealed.

Revision Note

Pursuant to §23G-15, in:

(1) Subsection
(b)(1), "or" deleted and punctuation changed; and

(2) Subsection
(b)(2) and (b)(3)(A) and (B), punctuation changed.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next